Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.120

Counting ballots—Official returns.

(1) All voted ballots must be manually inspected for damage, write-in votes, and incorrect or incomplete marks. If it is found that any ballot is damaged so that it cannot properly be counted by the vote tallying system, a true duplicate copy must be made of the damaged ballot in the presence of witnesses and substituted for the damaged ballot. All damaged ballots must be kept by the county auditor until sixty days after the primary or election or according to federal law, whichever is longer.

(2) The returns produced by the vote tallying system, to which have been added the counts of questioned ballots, and write-in votes, constitute the official returns of the primary or election in that county.

[ 2011 c 10 s 51; 2003 c 111 s 1512; 1999 c 158 s 15; 1990 c 59 s 33; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 74. Formerly RCW 29.54.085, 29.34.167.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.